dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: confugir
SFX 37 Y 77
SFX 37 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 37 r nt/_C ir
SFX 37 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 37 gir it/_v_Y ir
SFX 37 r da/_Y ir
SFX 37 gir ita/_Y ir
SFX 37 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 37 gir its/_Y ir
SFX 37 r des/_Y ir
SFX 37 gir ites/_Y ir
SFX 37 gir jo/_Z ir
SFX 37 gir ig/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 37 gir ig/_Z ir
SFX 37 r m/_Z ir
SFX 37 r u/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 37 r a/_Z ir
SFX 37 r es/_Z ir
SFX 37 r a/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 37 r en/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 37 r res/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 37 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 37 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 37 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 37 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 37 gir ja/_Z ir
SFX 37 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 37 r s/_Z ir
SFX 37 gir ja/_Z ir
SFX 37 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 37 r m/_Z ir
SFX 37 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 37 r u/_Z ir
SFX 37 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 37 r n/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 37 r res/_Z ir
SFX 37 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 37 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 37 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 37 gir ig/_C ir
SFX 37 gir ja/_D ir
SFX 37 r 0/_D ir
SFX 37 r m/_C ir
SFX 37 r guem/_C ir
SFX 37 r u/_C ir
SFX 37 ir en/_C ir
SFX 37 r n/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: constrènyer
SFX 38 Y 71
SFX 38 r r/_v_C_Y er
SFX 38 ènyer ényer/_v_C_Y er
SFX 38 ènyer enyent/_C er
SFX 38 ènyer et/_v_Y er
SFX 38 ènyer eta/_Y er
SFX 38 ènyer ets/_Y er
SFX 38 ènyer etes/_Y er
SFX 38 ènyer enyo/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer eny/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enys/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer eny/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyen/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyia/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyies/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyia/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyíem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyíeu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyien/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyí/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeres/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyé/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyérem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyéreu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeren/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeré/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeràs/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyerà/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyerem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyereu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeran/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeria/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeries/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeria/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeríem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeríeu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyerien/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enya/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyi/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyes/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyis/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enya/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyi/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyen/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyin/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyés/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyera/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyessis/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeres/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyesses/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyés/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyera/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyéssim/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyérem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyéssem/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyéssiu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyéreu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyésseu/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyessin/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeren/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer enyessen/_Z er
SFX 38 ènyer eny/_C er
SFX 38 ènyer enya/_D er
SFX 38 ènyer enyi/_D er
SFX 38 ènyer enyem/_C er
SFX 38 ènyer enyeu/_C er
SFX 38 ènyer enyen/_C er
SFX 38 ènyer enyin/_C er

# Model de conjugació: contradir
SFX 39 Y 75
SFX 39 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 39 r ent/_C ir
SFX 39 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 39 r ta/_Y ir
SFX 39 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 39 r tes/_Y ir
SFX 39 r c/_Z ir
SFX 39 r us/_Z ir
SFX 39 r u/_Z ir
SFX 39 r em/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir eim/_Z ir
SFX 39 r eu/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir eis/_Z ir
SFX 39 r uen/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir eia/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir eies/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir eia/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir èiem/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir éiem/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir èieu/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir éieu/_Z ir
SFX 39 ir eien/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guí/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gueres/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gué/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guérem/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guéreu/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gueren/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 39 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 39 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 39 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 39 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ga/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gui/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gues/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guis/_Z ir
SFX 39 r ga/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gui/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guen/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guin/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gués/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guera/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guessis/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gueres/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guesses/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gués/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guera/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guéssim/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guérem/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guéssem/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guéreu/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guésseu/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guessin/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gueren/_Z ir
SFX 39 r guessen/_Z ir
SFX 39 r gues/_C ir
SFX 39 ir ís/_C ir
SFX 39 r ga/_D ir
SFX 39 r gui/_D ir
SFX 39 r guem/_C ir
SFX 39 r gau/_C ir
SFX 39 r gueu/_C ir
SFX 39 r guen/_C ir
SFX 39 r guin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: contrafer
SFX 3A Y 80
SFX 3A r r/_v_C_Y er
SFX 3A r nt/_C er
SFX 3A r t/_v_Y er
SFX 3A r ta/_Y er
SFX 3A r ts/_Y er
SFX 3A r tes/_Y er
SFX 3A er aig/_Z er
SFX 3A er aç/_Z er
SFX 3A er às/_Z er
SFX 3A er à/_Z er
SFX 3A r m/_Z er
SFX 3A r im/_Z er
SFX 3A r u/_Z er
SFX 3A r is/_Z er
SFX 3A er an/_Z er
SFX 3A r ia/_Z er
SFX 3A r ies/_Z er
SFX 3A r ia/_Z er
SFX 3A er èiem/_Z er
SFX 3A er éiem/_Z er
SFX 3A er èieu/_Z er
SFX 3A er éieu/_Z er
SFX 3A r ien/_Z er
SFX 3A er iu/_Z er
SFX 3A r res/_Z er
SFX 3A er éu/_Z er
SFX 3A er é/_Z er
SFX 3A er érem/_Z er
SFX 3A er éreu/_Z er
SFX 3A r ren/_Z er
SFX 3A er aré/_Z er
SFX 3A er aràs/_Z er
SFX 3A er arà/_Z er
SFX 3A er arem/_Z er
SFX 3A er areu/_Z er
SFX 3A er aran/_Z er
SFX 3A er aria/_Z er
SFX 3A er aries/_Z er
SFX 3A er aria/_Z er
SFX 3A er aríem/_Z er
SFX 3A er aríeu/_Z er
SFX 3A er arien/_Z er
SFX 3A er aça/_Z er
SFX 3A er aci/_Z er
SFX 3A er aces/_Z er
SFX 3A er acis/_Z er
SFX 3A er aça/_Z er
SFX 3A er aci/_Z er
SFX 3A r m/_Z er
SFX 3A er acem/_Z er
SFX 3A r u/_Z er
SFX 3A er aceu/_Z er
SFX 3A er acen/_Z er
SFX 3A er acin/_Z er
SFX 3A er és/_Z er
SFX 3A r ra/_Z er
SFX 3A r ssis/_Z er
SFX 3A r res/_Z er
SFX 3A r sses/_Z er
SFX 3A er és/_Z er
SFX 3A r ra/_Z er
SFX 3A er éssim/_Z er
SFX 3A er érem/_Z er
SFX 3A er éssem/_Z er
SFX 3A er éssiu/_Z er
SFX 3A er éreu/_Z er
SFX 3A er ésseu/_Z er
SFX 3A r ssin/_Z er
SFX 3A r ren/_Z er
SFX 3A r ssen/_Z er
SFX 3A er és/_C er
SFX 3A er é/_C er
SFX 3A er aça/_D er
SFX 3A er aci/_D er
SFX 3A r m/_C er
SFX 3A er acem/_C er
SFX 3A r u/_C er
SFX 3A r is/_C er
SFX 3A er acen/_C er
SFX 3A er acin/_C er
